Hawaii, session 2026, SB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Mental health and suicide prevention hotlines; student identification cards; penalty. (a)  Except as provided in subsection (b) and subject to subsection (c), beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public and private school that serves students in grades six through twelve and issues student identification cards shall have printed on either side of the student identification cards the following: (1)  The telephone and text number of the national 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, 988; (2)  The Crisis Text Line, which can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741; and (3)  The telephone or text numbers of state or local mental health programs. (b)  If, as of January 1, 2025, a school subject to subsection (a) has a supply of unissued student identification cards that do not comply with the requirements of subsection (a), the school may issue those student identification cards until that supply is depleted. (c)  Subsection (a) shall apply for student identification cards issued: (1)  For the first time to a student; and (2)  To replace a damaged or lost student identification card. (d)  Any public or private school that knowingly violates this section shall be fined not more than $100 for each separate offense.  Any action taken to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this subsection shall be considered a civil action." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________